Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6844
Medical assistance program, defined.

Medical assistance program means the medical assistance program established pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act.

Laws 2020, LB997, § 11.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.